New York, session 2025-2026, A2700.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 67-b of the state finance law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (c) to read as follows: 3 (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this 4 subdivision, any state-supported debt issued during a declared state of 5 emergency shall be subject to legislative oversight as follows: 6 (i) The legislature shall, by resolution, vote to approve whether such 7 state-supported debt issued during the declared emergency shall be 8 subject to the debt cap limitations outlined in paragraph (a) of this 9 subdivision. 10 (ii) The resolution shall specify the: 11 (A) total amount of state-supported debt to be exempted from the debt 12 cap; 13 (B) purpose for which the debt is to be issued; and 14 (C) duration of the exemption, not to exceed the duration of the 15 declared emergency. 16 (iii) A two-thirds vote in both houses of the legislature shall be 17 required for approval of the resolution. 18 (iv) If the resolution is not approved, the state-supported debt 19 issued during the declared emergency shall remain subject to the debt 20 cap limitations set forth in paragraph (a) of this subdivision. 21 (v) The legislature may, by subsequent resolution approved in the same 22 manner as set forth in the paragraph, modify or rescind any previously 23 approved exemption to the debt cap for emergency-related debt. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05919-01-5 A. 2700 2 1 (vi) The state comptroller shall maintain a separate accounting of all 2 state-supported debt issued pursuant to this paragraph and report quar- 3 terly to the legislature on the status and impact on such debt issued 4 pursuant to this paragraph on the state's overall debt position. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.